Hawaii, session 2025, GM1372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Chapter 328G, Hawaii Revised Statues, is
amended by adding five new sections to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§328G-A Registry of distributors and retailers;
application; renewals; suspension or revocation of certificates;
exceptions. (a) The department shall establish and maintain a
registry of all manufactured hemp product distributors and
manufactured hemp product retailers doing business in the State.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2026, no manufactured hemp
product distributor or manufactured hemp product retailer shall
sell or offer for sale manufactured hemp products without a
certificate of registration issued by the department pursuant to
this section. It shall be the responsibility of the
manufactured hemp product distributor or manufactured hemp
£rodu^t retadler to confdrm thaL a yaJd^d certdfdcate of^
2025-3500 HB1482 CDl HMSO

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
registration has been obtained and is in compliance with any and
all laws, rules, and regulations.
(c) A manufactured hemp product distributor or
manufactured hemp product retailer that sells or offers for sale
or intends to sell or offer for sale manufactured hemp products
shall apply to the department to be registered and receive a
certificate of registration on an application form prescribed by
the department and pay an application fee of $50.
(d) An application that fails to contain all the
information as required by the department shall be deemed
incomplete. Any incomplete application shall be denied.
(e) After receipt of a complete and accurate application
form and payment of the application fee, the department shall
list the manufactured hemp product distributor or manufactured
hemp product retailer as a registrant on the registry and issue
a certificate of registration. Whenever a certificate of
registration is defaced, destroyed, or lost, the department may
issue a duplicate certificate of registration to the registrant
for a fee of $10 per copy.
(f) The department shall post on its website a current
list of registrants on the registry.
2025-3500 HB1482 GDI HMSO
MiiMHinnHiiHioniii

Page 3 . HII .B. N|k । O. -14J82
C.D. 1
(g) The certificate of registration shall be valid for
five years and shall be renewed by filing a completed renewal
application with^ and paying a renewal fee of $50 to, the
department.
(h) All fees required under this section shall be
non-transferable and non-refundable and shall be fully paid
before the issuance of a new or renewed certificate of
registration.
(i) The certificate of registration issued under this
section shall be displayed at all times in a conspicuous place
at the place of business where the sale of- manufactured hemp
products is conducted and a digital reproduction of the
certificate of registration shall be displayed conspicuously on
the website of a registrant conducting sales online.
(j) The department may suspend or revoke a registrant's
certificate of registration for failure to comply with this
chapter and rules adopted under this chapter pursuant to the
procedures set forth in section 328G-6.
(k) Carriers or entities that ship goods shall not be
subject to this section by reason of their receipt, carriage,
holding, shipping, or delivery of manufactured hemp products in
2025-3500 HB1482 CDl HMSO
IBinillllBHIIIWilllll

Page 4 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
th^iisual couxse of busijiess a^ca^rrie rs or eritities y}B^t sh^
goods unless the carrier or entity sells or offers for sale
manufactured hemp products.
(1) Hemp processors with a valid permit issued pursuant to
section 328G-2 shall be issued a certificate of registration and
added to the registry by the department for the sale and
distribution of manufactured hemp products at the locations
indicated on the permit. The certificate of registration shall
be issued with the same expiration date as found on the permit.
Application and renewal fees required in subsections (c) and (g)
shall not apply to hemp processors with a valid permit issued
pursuant to section 328G-2.
(m) This section shall not apply to the sale of the
following manufactured hemp products;
(1) Products that are topically applied; or
(2) Tinctures; provided that tinctures shall not be sold
to individuals under the age of twenty-one;
provided further that the manufactured hemp products otherwise
comply with this chapter and any rules adopted pursuant to this
chapter.
2025-3500 HB1482 GDI HMSO

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
§328G-B Unlawful hemp distribution or retailing. (a) A
person or entity required to be registered as a manufactured
hemp product distributor or manufactured hemp product retailer
under this chapter commits the offense of unlawful hemp
distribution or retailing if the person or entity recklessly
fails to register as a manufactured hemp product distributor or
manufactured hemp product retailer as required under section
328G-A and, for the purposes of distribution or retail sale,
recklessly sells, possesses, stores, acquires, or distributes
any product containing or derived from hemp, or marketed as
containing or being derived from hemp.
(b) Unlawful hemp distribution or retailing shall be a
misdemeanor, except that any offense under subsection (a) that
occurs within five years of a conviction for unlawful hemp
distribution or retailing shall be a class C felony.
§328G-C Inspection authority. The department and the
attorney general may inspect the operations, premises, and
storage areas of any entity engaged in the distribution or sale
of any product containing or derived from hemp, or marketed as
containing or being derived from hemp, during regular business
hours, to verify compliance with this chapter. The inspection
2025-3500 HB1482 GDI HMSO
IIDIilllllMIIMIIIIII

Page 6 H.B. NO. 1482
H.D. 1
S.D. 3
C.D. 1
shall include examination of all statements, bookSz papers, and
records in whatever format, including electronic format,
pertaining to the cultivation, processing, acquisition,
possession, transportation, sale, or use any product containing
or derived from hemp, or marketed as containing or being derived
from hemp. The inspection may also include taking reasonable
samples and conducting tests to verify compliance with this
chapter. Every entity in possession of any statements, books,
papers, and records, and the entity's agents and employees,
shall be required to give the department and attorney general
the means, facilities, and opportunities for the examinations.
§328G-D Forfeiture; confiscation and seizure; disposition.
(a) The department, attorney general, department of law
enforcement, and the police department of each county may seize
and confiscate any product containing or derived from hemp, or
marketed as containing or being derived from hemp, that is
possessed, kept, stored, retained, held, owned, received,
acquired, distributed, sold, or offered for sale in violation of
this chapter. The department seizing products as evidence shall
not be responsible for the care and maintenance of the products.
2025-3500 HB1482 CDl HMSO 6
iimiBmoiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

H.B. NO.
hTi
C.D. 1
(b) Any product seized or confiscated under this section
may be subject to forfeiture for destruction pursuant to chapter
712A or section 328G-6.
§328G-E Tinctures; persons under twenty-one years of age.
(a) It shall be unlawful to sell or furnish a tincture to a
person under twenty-one years of age.
(b) All persons engaged in the retail sale of tinctures
shall check the identification of tincture purchasers to
establish the age of the purchaser if the purchaser reasonably
appears to be under twenty-seven years of age.
(c) It shall be an affirmative defense that the
manufactured hemp product retailer that sells a tincture to a
person under twenty-one years of age in violation of this
section had requested, examined^ and reasonably relied upon a
photographic identification from the person establishing that
person's age as at least twenty-one years of age before selling
the person a tincture. The failure of a manufactured hemp
product retailer to request and examine photographic
identification from a person under twenty-one years of age
before the sale of a tincture to the person shall be construed
against the manufactured hemp product retailer and form a
2025-3500 HB1482 GDI HMSO
iiiniiiniiiiuiNiniHnn

Page 8 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
conclusive basis for the manufactured hemp product retailer's
violation of this section.
(d) It shall be unlawful for a person under twenty-one
years of age to purchase or possess any tincture. This
provision shall not apply if a person under the age of twenty-
one, with parental authorization^ is participating in a
controlled purchase as part of a law enforcement activity or a
study authorized by the department under the supervision of law
enforcement to determine the level of incidence of tincture
sales to persons under twenty-one years of age.
(e) Any person who violates subsection (a) shall be fined
$500 for the first offense. Any subsequent offenses shall
subject the person to a fine no less than $500 and no more than
$2,000. Any person under twenty-one years of age who violates
subsection (d) shall be fined $10 for the first offense. Any
subsequent offense shall subject the violator to a fine of $50,
no part of which shall be suspended, or the person shall be
required to perform no less than forty-eight hours and no more
than seventy-two hours of community service during hours when
the person is not employed and is not attending school. Any
tincture in the person's possession at the time of violation of
2025-3500 HB1482 CDl HMSO
nniHiiiniinnMiiiii

Page 9 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
subsection (d) shall be seized, summarily forfeited to the
State, and destroyed by law enforcement following the conclusion
of an administrative or judicial proceeding finding that a
violation of subsection (d) has been committed. The procedures
set forth in chapter 712A shall not apply to this subsection."
SECTION 2. Section 328G-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By adding eight new definitions to be appropriately
inserted and to read:
""Certificate of registration" means the certificate issued
by the department authorizing the sale of manufactured hemp
products by the registrant.
"Consumer" means a person who is a member of the public, is
not functioning in the capacity of an operator of a hemp
processing facility, and does not process hemp biomass, produce
manufactured hemp products, or offer manufactured hemp products
for resale.
"Manufactured hemp product distributor" means a person
selling manufactured hemp products to a manufactured hemp
product retailer and includes the person's agents and employees.
2025-3500 HB1482 CDl HMSO 9
iiiuiiiiMniiniiiiiii

Page 10 H.B. NO.
hTi
C.D. 1
"Manufactured hemp product retailer” means a person selling
manufactured hemp products to consumers and includes the
person's agents and employees.
"Registrant" means the holder of the certificate of
registration.
"Registry" means a database of registered manufactured hemp
product distributors and manufactured hemp product retailers
maintained by the department.
"Sale", "sell", or "selling", means offering any
transactions, whether cash is actually paid therefor or not, of
hemp, hemp biomass, crude extract, or manufactured hemp products
and includes resale and every act of selling that originates
from any order that is placed or submitted in-person or by means
of telephonic or other synchronous online communication methods,
the mail, catalog, or digital application, or the Internet or
other online service.
"Tincture" means any oil-based, unflavored product that
contains no more than;
(1) One ounce per container; and
(2) 0.3 per cent tetrahydrocannabinol."
2. By amending the definition of "permit"- to read:
2025-3500 HB1482 GDI HMSO 10

Page 11 H.B. NO 1482
H.D. 1
S.D. 3
C.D. 1
""Permit" means the document issued by the
department attesting that the applicant is permitted to operate
as a hemp processor."
SECTION 3. Section 328G-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§328G-6 Enforcement; penalty. (a) Any person who
violates this chapter or any rule adopted by the department
pursuant to this chapter shall be fined [ftefe] no more than
$10,000 for each separate offense. Any action taken to collect
the penalty provided for in this subsection shall be considered
a civil action. In addition to any other administrative or
judicial remedy provided by this chapter, or by rules adopted
pursuant to this chapter, the director may impose by order
[the] 2.
(1) The administrative penalty specified in this section
[or revoke]£
(2) The forfeiture of products possessed, kept, stored,
retained, held, owned, received, acquired,
distributed, sold, or offered for sale in violation of
this chapter;
2025-3500 HB1482 CDl HMSO

■iHiiiniMiiiiiiiiii

Page 12 H.B. NO. 1482
H.D. 1
S.D. 3
C.D. 1
(3) The revocation of a permit or suspension or revocation
of a certificate of registration pursuant to this
chapter[—]; or
(4) Any combination of paragraphs (1)< (2)^ and (3).
(b) Any order issued under this chapter shall become
final, unless [not] later than twenty days after the notice
of order is served, the person or persons named therein request
in writing a hearing before the director. Any penalty imposed,
including the revocation of a permit[—] or suspension or
revocation of a certificate of registration, shall become final,
and any monetary penalty shall become due and payable twenty
days after the order is served unless the person or persons
named therein request in writing a hearing before the director.
Whenever a hearing is requested, the penalty imposed, including
permit revocation, or suspension or revocation of a certificate
of registration, shall become final, and any monetary penalty
shall become due and payable only upon completion of all review
proceedings and the issuance of a final order confirming the
penalty in whole or in part. Any hearing shall be conducted in
accordance with chapter 91.
2025-3500 HB1482 CDl HMSO

ffliiiiiimiMiiiiiiiiiH

Page 13 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(c) In any judicial proceeding to enforce an order issued
by the department pursuant to this section, including but not
limited to the recovery of administrative penalties imposed by
order against a hemp processor [7-] or registrant, the director
may petition any court of appropriate jurisdiction for relief
and need only show that:
(1) Notice was given;
(2) A hearing was held or the time granted for requesting
a hearing has expired without such a request;
(3) The administrative penalty was imposed hemp
processor’s permit was revoked[^^] , or the registrant's
certificate of registration was suspended or revoked;
and
(4) The penalty remains unpaid or the hemp processor or
the registrant continues to operate.
(d) The director, in the event there is deemed a potential
health hazard, may take precautionary measures to protect the
public through imposition of an embargo, the detention and
removal of hemp, hemp biomass, crude extract, or manufactured
hemp products from the market, and the sequestration of hemp,
hemp biomass, crude extract, or manufactured hemp products
2025-3500 HB1482 GDI HMSO 1
ininniiiMiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 14 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
suspected to be contaminated or otherwise harmful to human
health. In the event of any embargo or detention of hemp, hemp
biomass, crude extract, or manufactured hemp products, the
person or persons so named in the order imposing the embargo or
detention shall be afforded an opportunity to contest the
findings of the department in a hearing pursuant to chapter 91.
(e) Nothing in this chapter shall limit any other legal
remedy, or limit any civil or criminal action, available under
any other statute, rule, or ordinance.
(f) In addition to any penalties provided by law, a
violation of section 328G-B shall be subject to nuisance
abatement proceedings provided in part V of chapter 712.
(g) In addition to any penalties provided by law, any
product containing or derived from hemp, or marketed as
containing or being derived from hemp sold or distributed in
violation of section 328G-B shall be subject to forfeiture under
chapter 712A.
(h) In addition to any penalties provided by law, a
violation of this chapter shall constitute an unfair or
deceptive act or practice and unfair method of competition
2025-3500 HB1482 GDI HMSO 14
HiiiiiiiiiimiH

Page 15
H.B. NO.
S.D. 3
C.D. 1
pursuant to section 480-2 and shall be subject to a civil
penalty as provided in section 480-3.1."
SECTION 4. Section 328G-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) Moneys in the Hawaii hemp processing special fund
shall be used by the department for the following purposes:
(1) To establish and regulate a system of permitting hemp
processors and the sale, holding, offering, or
distributing for sale of crude extract and
manufactured hemp products;
(2) To establish and regulate a system for registering
manufactured hemp product distributors and
manufactured hemp product retailers to sell
manufactured hemp products;
[-(-2-)-] (3) To fund positions and operating costs authorized
by the legislature; and
[ (3) ] (4) For any other expenditure necessary, consistent
with this chapter, to implement the Hawaii hemp
processing program."
SECTION 5. Section 329D-2.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
2025-3500 HB1482 CDl HMSO

Page 16
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
"(b) The office of medical cannabis control and regulation
shall administer medical cannabis dispensary licensure and
regulation, pursuant to this chapter [7—aftd]2_ the registration of
qualifying patients and primary caregivers, pursuant to part IX
of chapter 32 9[—]; and the hemp processors program, pursuant to
chapter 328G.''
SECTION 6. Section 712-1270, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§712-1270 Places used to commit offenses against public
health and morals or other offenses, a nuisance. Every
building, premises, or place used for the purpose of violating:
(1) Those laws pertaining to offenses against public
health and morals contained in this chapter, except
offenses under part IV that do not involve the
manufacture or distribution of drugs and activities
under part III that involve only social gambling as
defined in section 712-1231 (a);
(2) Section 132D-14(a)(1) or (3); [e^]
(3) Any offense under part II of chapter 708 that involves
a person unlawfully residing on or otherwise occupying
2025-3500 HB1482 CDl HMSO


Page 17 H.B. NO 1482
H.D. 1
S.D. 3
C.D. 1
real property to which the person has no title, lease,
or other legal claim[—]; or
(4) Section 328G-B,
and every building, premises, or place in or upon which
violations of any of the laws set forth in paragraph (1), (2) ,
[■&r] (3) , or (4) are held or occur, is a nuisance that shall be
enjoined, abated, and prevented, regardless of whether it is a
public or private nuisance."
SECTION 7. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 8. If any provision of this Act, or the
application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held
invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this Act are severable.
SECTION 9. In codifying the new sections added by
section 1 and referenced in sections 3 and 6 of this Act, the
revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers
2025-3500 HB1482 CDl HMSO


Page 18
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
for the letters used in designating the new sections in this
Act.
SECTION 10. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 11. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3500 HB1482 CDl HMSO 18
iiiMniiDiinHiiiiH

1482
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 3
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 2nd day of July . 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1482, HD 1, SD 3, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
/
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1482, H.D. 1, S.D. 3, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
253